Missouri, session 2026, SB863.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 167.795, to read as
follows:
167.795. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Activities association", any nonprofit statewide
organization that satisfies the following criteria:
(a) The organization facilitates interscholastic
activities for secondary school students, including, but not
limited to, interscholastic athletic activities;
(b) More than fifty percent of the activities
facilitated by the organization are interscholastic athletic
activities; and
(c) The organization's members include at least one
public school or school district that pays any fees to such
association, including, but not limited to, activity
participation fees, tournament registration fees, membership
fees, or any other fees or payments relating to membership

SS#2 SB 863 2
in the organization or participation in any activities
facilitated by the organization;
(d) The term "activities association" does not include
organizations that do not facilitate interscholastic
athletic activities. Such organizations may include, but
are not limited to, career and technical student
organizations, academic honor societies, service
organizations, leadership organizations, or other student
clubs or organizations that do not facilitate
interscholastic athletic activities;
(2) "Department", the department of elementary and
secondary education;
(3) "Public school", as defined in section 160.011.
The term shall be construed to include a charter school.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, beginning in the 2027-28 school year and
continuing in all subsequent school years, appeals of
decisions made by an activities association may be heard as
provided in subsection 3 of this section by the
"Interscholastic Athletic Oversight Commission", which is
hereby established. The oversight commission shall consist
of five members appointed by the governor, by and with the
advice and consent of the senate. The term of office of
each member shall be four years, except that of the initial
appointed members, two members shall serve terms of two
years and three members shall serve terms of four years. At
the expiration of the term of each member, the governor, by
and with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint
a successor. If the general assembly is not in session at
the time for making an appointment, the governor shall make
a temporary appointment as in the case of a vacancy.

SS#2 SB 863 3
3. The oversight commission shall hear appeals after
the activities association's appeals process has been
exhausted. The appealing party is entitled to file an
appeal directly with the oversight commission without first
exhausting the activities association's appeals process.
The oversight commission shall hear only the following
appeals:
(1) Appeals relating to eligibility due to transfers
of students deemed to be for athletic purposes; and
(2) Appeals relating to contests and contest
procedures.
4. The oversight commission may make recommendations
to an activities association for rule changes to be
considered through the activities association's rulemaking
procedures.
5. An activities association shall prepare an annual
report and present to a house committee to be chosen by the
speaker of the house of representatives within the first
thirty days of the legislative session and a senate
committee to be chosen by the president pro tempore of the
senate within the first thirty days of the legislative
session.
6. The oversight commission is established within the
department for the purposes of hearing the appeals. The
department shall provide sufficient administrative and
financial personnel to support the work of the oversight
commission, and shall promulgate rules concerning the
timelines and procedural rules for the oversight
commission's appeals process.
7. If the oversight commission is named as a defendant
in any court action arising from or relating to a decision
of the oversight commission, the attorney general shall

SS#2 SB 863 4
represent the oversight commission and the state shall be
responsible for all attorney's fees, costs, and damages
incurred.
8. The oversight commission may hold meetings in
person or through remote communication methods, such as
teleconference, video conference, or other comparable
virtual communication platforms.
9. All decisions made by the oversight commission are
final and not subject to further appeal. An activities
association shall adhere to and implement all decisions
involving such activities association made by the oversight
commission.
10. The department shall promulgate rules as necessary
to implement a fair and timely appeals process, including
timelines and procedural rules for an appeal to be heard by
the oversight commission. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
100 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
101 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
102 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
103 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
104 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
105 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓